Louisiana, session 2026, HB173.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:866(I) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§866. Compulsory motor vehicle liability security; failure to comply; limitation of
damages
* * *
I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, there shall be
no recovery for bodily injury or property damage for a driver with a lapse in
coverage that exceeds thirty days.